Hawaii, session 2025, SB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 261-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§261‑4.5[]]  Biosecurity[, inspection, and]; fireworks; inspections; cargo support facilities.  (a) The department shall coordinate with the department of agriculture to facilitate the inspection, consolidation, deconsolidation, and treatment of imported and exported agriculture and other inspected commodities to meet the needs of each island and to facilitate the safe movement of enplaned and deplaned air cargo through the airports. (b) The department shall install and use at each state airport electronic equipment capable of scanning air cargo container loads to detect illegal fireworks." SECTION 2.  Section 266-21.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§266‑21.5[]]  Biosecurity[, inspection, and]; fireworks; inspections; cargo support facilities.  (a) The department of transportation shall provide space at commercial harbors for biosecurity and inspection facilities and to facilitate the safe and efficient movement of maritime cargo through the commercial harbors. (b)  The department of transportation and department of agriculture shall plan, design, and construct biosecurity, inspection, consolidation, deconsolidation, and treatment facilities for use by the department of agriculture to enhance the efficient and safe movement of imported and exported marine cargo, to include food [[]safety[]] and food security guidelines and standards. (c) The department of transportation shall install and use at each commercial harbor electronic equipment capable of scanning cargo container loads to detect illegal fireworks." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________